Washington statutes.
RCW 15.62.180

Reporting.

Each affected person shall, as required, file with the commission a return under oath on forms to be furnished by the commission, stating the information requested by the commission regarding the ownership, handling, processing, manufacturing, delivering, shipping, sale, and brokering of various honey bee industry products and activities as defined in RCW 15.62.020. The report shall cover the period or periods of time prescribed by the commission.

[ 1989 c 5 s 18.]